District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.16

Transfer of ammunition feeding devices prohibited.

Except as provided in § 7-2507.05, and § 22-4517, the Metropolitan Police Department shall not transfer any ammunition feeding device in its possession to any person or entity other than a law enforcement officer or governmental agency for law enforcement purposes.

History

Sept. 22, 1995, D.C. Law 11-50, § 2, 42 DCR 3680

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-191.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of (D.C. Law 11-35, September 8, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 5304).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2 of the Prohibition on the Transfer of Firearms Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-58, May 18, 1995, 42 DCR 2574).